Maine, session 132, LD1626.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §13803 is enacted to read:
§13803. Professional development; educational technicians and school support staff
A school administrative unit shall provide professional development opportunities for
certain school employees in accordance with this section.
1. Definitions. For the purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise indicates,
the following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Educational technician" has the same meaning as in section 13001-A, subsection
8.
B. "School support staff member" means a public school employee who is not an
educational technician and who is paid on an hourly basis.
2. Annual professional development. A school administrative unit shall annually
provide at least 6 hours of paid, in-person professional development opportunities for all
educational technicians and other school support staff members. At least 4 of the required
6 hours must be completed before the first instructional day of the school year or within 30
days of an educational technician's or school support staff member's hiring.
3. Additional training; school support staff. Within 60 days of a school support staff
member's first day of working with students, a school administrative unit shall train the
school support staff member on the following:
A. The school administrative unit's emergency procedures and policies;
B. The school administrative unit's confidentiality policies;
C. The school support staff member's reporting obligations;
D. The roles and responsibilities of the school support staff member in addition to the
roles and responsibilities of other school employees and administrators;
E. The school administrative unit's discipline policies; and
F. The relevant school facilities.
4. Additional training; educational technicians. Prior to or immediately following
an educational technician's first day of employment, a school administrative unit shall train
the educational technician on the following:
A. The school administrative unit's emergency procedures and policies;
B. The school administrative unit's confidentiality policies;
C. The educational technician's reporting obligations;
D. The roles and responsibilities of the educational technician in addition to the roles
and responsibilities of other school employees and administrators;
E. The school administrative unit's discipline policies;
F. The relevant school facilities; and
Page 1 - 132LR1265(01)

G. Any other relevant topics, including, but not limited to, training on specific
disabilities and behavioral needs of the students that the educational technician works
with to assist the educational technician with meeting the needs of the students.
5. Review of individualized education program. Within 5 days of an educational
technician's beginning to work with an individual student, a school administrative unit shall
provide the educational technician with either paid time outside of the school day or time
during the school day to review or be briefed by the appropriate school employees on the
student's individualized education program.
6. Continued training. In addition to the annual professional development
requirements described in subsection 2, a school administrative unit shall annually provide
paid training to educational technicians that enables them to continue to develop knowledge
and skills relevant to the students they work with, including, but not limited to, training on:
A. Following lesson plans;
B. Specific disabilities;
C. The individual needs of each student; and
D. How individual students' disabilities affect their education and behavior.